Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
ARTICLE 3.3
STUDENT FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 TUITION ASSISTANCE

PART 3 STUDENT LOAN MATCHING

PART 4 WORK-STUDY PROGRAM

PART 5 SCHOLARSHIP AND GRANT PROGRAM

PART 6 COLORADO EDUCATIONAL EXCHANGE PROGRAM

PART 7 COLORADO NURSING SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM

PART 8 EARLY CHILDHOOD PROFESSIONAL LOAN REPAYMENT PROGRAM

PART 9 TEACH COLORADO GRANT INITIATIVE

PART 10 COLORADO OPPORTUNITY SCHOLARSHIP INITIATIVE

PART 11 TUITION ASSISTANCE FOR CAREER AND TECHNICAL EDUCATION CERTIFICATE PROGRAMS

PART 12 COLORADO SECOND CHANCE SCHOLARSHIP

PART 13 FOURTH-YEAR INNOVATION PILOT PROGRAM

PART 14 FOSTER YOUTH FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE PROGRAM